South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3080.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 63-3-830 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: (C) A guardian ad litem must provide to both party's attorneys, or to the parties themselves if not represented by an attorney, copies of all written communications between the guardian ad litem and any therapist, psychologist, psychiatrist, or other professional who has provided a service or evaluation related to the case, including a copy of any report or opinion offered by the professional. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----